District of Columbia statutes.
41-201

Filing and indexing of financial statements; legal effect.

It is not necessary for the Recorder of Deeds to spread upon the records of his office the financing statements or other papers filed pursuant to part 4 of Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code, but they shall be indexed and, except as hereinafter provided, shall be kept on file and shall be open to inspection by the public, and shall have the same force and legal effect as if they were actually recorded in the books of his office.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 546-C
Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1103, ch. 417
June 5, 1952, 66 Stat. 126, ch. 370, § 2
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 772, Pub. L. 88-243, § 10
1981 Ed., § 42-101.
1973 Ed., § 42-102.